Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-807
Chiropractic; license; qualifications required.

Every applicant for a license to practice chiropractic shall present proof of graduation from an accredited college of chiropractic and (1) pass an examination given by the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners which consists of Parts I, II, III, IV, and physiotherapy or (2) pass an examination approved by the Board of Chiropractic.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 78, p. 475;

C.S.1929, § 71-1103;

R.S.1943, § 71-179;

Laws 1965, c. 413, § 1, p. 1321;

Laws 1975, LB 92, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 29;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 65;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-179;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 248.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.

The practice of chiropractic is a skilled profession, and as such, chiropractic testimony may qualify as "competent medical testimony" under workers' compensation rules. Rodgers v. Sparks, 228 Neb. 191, 421 N.W.2d 785 (1988).